Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2568.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-2003, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-2003. Authorized disclosure of confidential information A. Confidential information relating to: 1. A taxpayer may be disclosed to the taxpayer, its successor in interest or a designee of the taxpayer who is authorized in writing by the taxpayer. A principal corporate officer of a parent corporation may execute a written authorization for a controlled subsidiary. If a taxpayer elects to file an Arizona small business income tax return under section 43-302, a written authorization by the taxpayer to allow the department to disclose personal income tax information to a designee includes the corresponding Arizona small business income tax return. 2. A corporate taxpayer may be disclosed to any principal officer, any person designated by a principal officer or any person designated in a resolution by the corporate board of directors or other similar governing body. If a corporate officer signs a statement under penalty of perjury representing that the officer is a principal officer, the department may rely on the statement until the statement is shown to be false. For the purposes of this paragraph, "principal officer" includes a chief executive officer, president, secretary, treasurer, vice president of tax, chief financial officer, chief operating officer or chief tax officer or any other corporate officer who has the authority to bind the taxpayer on matters related to state taxes. 3. A partnership may be disclosed to any partner of the partnership.  This exception does not include disclosure of confidential information of a particular partner unless otherwise authorized. 4. A limited liability company may be disclosed to any member of the company or, if the company is manager-managed, to any manager. 5. An estate may be disclosed to the personal representative of the estate and to any heir, next of kin or beneficiary under the will of the decedent if the department finds that the heir, next of kin or beneficiary has a material interest that will be affected by the confidential information. 6. A trust may be disclosed to the trustee or trustees, jointly or separately, and to the grantor or any beneficiary of the trust if the department finds that the grantor or beneficiary has a material interest that will be affected by the confidential information. 7. A government entity may be disclosed to the head of the entity or a member of the governing board of the entity, or any employee of the entity who has been delegated the authorization in writing by the head of the entity or the governing board of the entity. 8. Any taxpayer may be disclosed if the taxpayer has waived any rights to confidentiality either in writing or on the record in any administrative or judicial proceeding. 9. The name and taxpayer identification numbers of persons issued direct payment permits may be publicly disclosed. 10. Any taxpayer may be disclosed during a meeting or telephone call if the taxpayer is present during the meeting or telephone call and authorizes the disclosure of confidential information. B. Confidential information may be disclosed to: 1. Any employee of the department whose official duties involve tax administration. 2. The office of the attorney general solely for its use in preparation for, or in an investigation that may result in, any proceeding involving tax administration before the department or any other agency or board of this state, or before any grand jury or any state or federal court. 3. The department of liquor licenses and control for its use in determining whether a spirituous liquor licensee has paid all transaction privilege taxes and affiliated excise taxes incurred as a result of the sale of spirituous liquor, as defined in section 4-101, at the licensed establishment and imposed on the licensed establishments by this state and its political subdivisions. 4. Other state tax officials whose official duties require the disclosure for proper tax administration purposes if the information is sought in connection with an investigation or any other proceeding conducted by the official.  Any disclosure is limited to information of a taxpayer who is being investigated or who is a party to a proceeding conducted by the official. 5. The following agencies, officials and organizations, if they grant substantially similar privileges to the department for the type of information being sought, pursuant to statute and a written agreement between the department and the foreign country, agency, state, Indian tribe or organization: (a) The United States internal revenue service, alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States treasury, United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives of the United States department of justice, United States drug enforcement agency and federal bureau of investigation. (b) A state tax official of another state. (c) An organization of states, federation of tax administrators or multistate tax commission that operates an information exchange for tax administration purposes. (d) An agency, official or organization of a foreign country with responsibilities that are comparable to those listed in subdivision (a), (b) or (c) of this paragraph. (e) An agency, official or organization of an Indian tribal government with responsibilities comparable to the responsibilities of the agencies, officials or organizations identified in subdivision (a), (b) or (c) of this paragraph. 6. The auditor general, in connection with any audit of the department subject to the restrictions in section 42-2002, subsection D. 7. Any person to the extent necessary for effective tax administration in connection with: (a) The processing, storage, transmission, destruction and reproduction of the information. (b) The programming, maintenance, repair, testing and procurement of equipment for purposes of tax administration. (c) The collection of the taxpayer's civil liability. 8. The office of administrative hearings relating to taxes administered by the department pursuant to section 42-1101, but the department shall not disclose any confidential information without the taxpayer's written consent: (a) Regarding income tax or withholding tax. (b) On any tax issue relating to information associated with the reporting of income tax or withholding tax. 9. The United States treasury inspector general for tax administration for the purpose of reporting a violation of internal revenue code section 7213A (26 United States Code section 7213A), unauthorized inspection of returns or return information. 10. The financial management service of the United States treasury department for use in the treasury offset program. 11. The United States treasury department or its authorized agent for use in the state income tax levy program and in the electronic federal tax payment system. 12. The Arizona commerce authority for its use in: (a) Qualifying renewable energy operations for the tax incentives under section 42-12006. (b) Qualifying businesses with a qualified facility for income tax credits under sections 43-1083.03 and 43-1164.04. (c) Fulfilling its annual reporting responsibility pursuant to section 41-1512, subsections U and V and section 41-1517, subsection L. (d) Certifying computer data centers for tax relief under section 41-1519. (e) Certifying applicants for the tax credit for motion picture production costs under sections 43-1082 and 43-1165. 13. A prosecutor for purposes of section 32-1164, subsection C. 14. The office of the state fire marshal for use in determining compliance with and enforcing title 37, chapter 9, article 5. 15. The department of transportation for its use in administering taxes, surcharges and penalties prescribed by title 28. 16. The Arizona health care cost containment system administration for its use in administering nursing facility provider assessments. 17. The department of administration risk management division and the office of the attorney general if the information relates to a claim against this state pursuant to section 12-821.01 involving the department of revenue. 18. Another state agency if the taxpayer authorizes the disclosure of confidential information in writing, including an authorization that is part of an application form or other document submitted to the agency. 19. The department of economic security for its use in determining whether an employer has paid all amounts due under the unemployment insurance program pursuant to title 23, chapter 4. 20. The department of health services for its use in determining the following: (a) Whether a medical marijuana dispensary is in compliance with the tax requirements of chapter 5 of this title for the purposes of section 36-2806, subsection A. (b) Whether a marijuana establishment, marijuana testing facility or dual licensee licensed under title 36, chapter 28.2 is in compliance with the tax obligations under this title or title 43. 21. The Arizona department of agriculture for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with the licensing provisions in title 3. 22. The office of economic opportunity for the purpose of performing the duties and obligations to or on behalf of this state prescribed by title 41, chapter 53. C. Confidential information may be disclosed in any state or federal judicial or administrative proceeding pertaining to tax administration pursuant to the following conditions: 1. One or more of the following circumstances must apply: (a) The taxpayer is a party to the proceeding. (b) The proceeding arose out of, or in connection with, determining the taxpayer's civil or criminal liability, or the collection of the taxpayer's civil liability, with respect to any tax imposed under this title or title 43. (c) The treatment of an item reflected on the taxpayer's return is directly related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. (d) Return information directly relates to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer and directly affects the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 2. Confidential information may not be disclosed under this subsection if the disclosure is prohibited by section 42-2002, subsection C or D. D. Identity information may be disclosed for purposes of notifying persons entitled to tax refunds if the department is unable to locate the persons after reasonable effort. E. The department, on the request of any person, shall provide the names and addresses of bingo licensees as defined in section 5-401, verify whether or not a person has a privilege license and number, a tobacco product distributor's license and number or a withholding license and number or disclose the information to be posted on the department's website or otherwise publicly accessible pursuant to section 42-1124, subsection F and section 42-3401. F. A department employee, in connection with the official duties relating to any audit, collection activity or civil or criminal investigation, may disclose return information to the extent that disclosure is necessary to obtain information that is not otherwise reasonably available. These official duties include the correct determination of and liability for tax, the amount to be collected or the enforcement of other state tax revenue laws. G. Confidential information relating to transaction privilege tax, use tax, severance tax, jet fuel excise and use tax and any other tax collected by the department on behalf of any jurisdiction may be disclosed to any county, city or town tax official if the information relates to a taxpayer who is or may be taxable by a county, city or town or who may be subject to audit by the department pursuant to section 42-6002. Any taxpayer information that is released by the department to the county, city or town: 1. May be used only for internal purposes, including audits and communication with taxpayers for the purposes of the notice required by section 9-499.15, subsection C. If there is a legitimate business need relating to enforcing laws, regulations and ordinances pursuant to section 9-500.39 or 11-269.17, a county, city or town tax official may redisclose transaction privilege tax information relating to a vacation rental or short-term rental property owner or online lodging operator from the new license report and license update report, subject to the following: (a) The information redisclosed is limited to the following: (i) The transaction privilege tax license number. (ii) The type of organization or ownership of the business. (iii) The legal business name and doing business as name, if different from the legal name. (iv) The business mailing address, tax record physical location address, telephone number, email address and fax number. (v) The date the business started in this state, the business description and the North American industry classification system code. (vi) The name, address and telephone number for each owner, partner, corporate officer, member, managing member or official of the employing unit. (b) Redisclosure is limited to nonelected officials in other units within the county, city or town. The information may not be redisclosed to an elected official or the elected official's staff. (c) All redisclosures of confidential information made pursuant to this paragraph are subject to paragraph 2 of this subsection. 2. May not be disclosed to the public in any manner that does not comply with confidentiality standards established by the department. The county, city or town shall agree in writing with the department that any release of confidential information that violates the confidentiality standards adopted by the department will result in the immediate suspension of any rights of the county, city or town to receive taxpayer information under this subsection. H. The department may disclose statistical information gathered from confidential information if it does not disclose confidential information attributable to any one taxpayer.  The department may disclose statistical information gathered from confidential information, even if it discloses confidential information attributable to a taxpayer, to: 1. The state treasurer in order to comply with the requirements of section 42-5029, subsection A, paragraph 3. 2. The joint legislative income tax credit review committee, the joint legislative budget committee staff and the legislative staff in order to comply with the requirements of section 43-221. I. The department may disclose the aggregate amounts of any tax credit, tax deduction or tax exemption enacted after January 1, 1994. Information subject to disclosure under this subsection shall not be disclosed if a taxpayer demonstrates to the department that such information would give an unfair advantage to competitors. J. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection C, confidential information, described in section 42-2001, paragraph 1, subdivision (a), item (ii), may be disclosed to law enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes. K. The department may provide transaction privilege tax license information to property tax officials in a county for the purpose of identification and verification of the tax status of commercial property. L. The department may provide transaction privilege tax, luxury tax, use tax, property tax and severance tax information to the ombudsman-citizens aide pursuant to title 41, chapter 8, article 5. M. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, a court may order the department to disclose confidential information pertaining to a party to an action.  An order shall be made only on a showing of good cause and that the party seeking the information has made demand on the taxpayer for the information. N. This section does not prohibit the disclosure by the department of any information or documents submitted to the department by a bingo licensee.  Before disclosing the information, the department shall obtain the name and address of the person requesting the information. O. If the department is required or allowed to disclose confidential information, it may charge the person or agency requesting the information for the reasonable cost of its services. P. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, the department of revenue shall release confidential information as requested by the department of economic security pursuant to section 42-1122 or 46-291. Information disclosed under this subsection is limited to the same type of information that the United States internal revenue service is authorized to disclose under section 6103(l)(6) of the internal revenue code. Q. Except as provided in section 42-2002, subsection D, the department shall release confidential information as requested by the courts and clerks of the court pursuant to section 42-1122. R. To comply with the requirements of section 42-5031, the department may disclose to the state treasurer, to the county stadium district board of directors and to any city or town tax official that is part of the county stadium district confidential information attributable to a taxpayer's business activity conducted in the county stadium district. S. The department shall release to the attorney general confidential information as requested by the attorney general for purposes of determining compliance with or enforcing any of the following: 1. Any public health control law relating to tobacco sales as provided under title 36, chapter 6, article 14. 2. Any law relating to reduced cigarette ignition propensity standards as provided under title 37, chapter 9, article 5. 3. Sections 44-7101 and 44-7111, the master settlement agreement referred to in those sections and all agreements regarding disputes under the master settlement agreement. T. For proceedings before the department, the office of administrative hearings, the state board of tax appeals or any state or federal court involving penalties that were assessed against a return preparer, an electronic return preparer or a payroll service company pursuant to section 42-1103.02, 42-1125.01 or 43-419, confidential information may be disclosed only before the judge or administrative law judge adjudicating the proceeding, the parties to the proceeding and the parties' representatives in the proceeding prior to its introduction into evidence in the proceeding. The confidential information may be introduced as evidence in the proceeding only if the taxpayer's name, the names of any dependents listed on the return, all social security numbers, the taxpayer's address, the taxpayer's signature and any attachments containing any of the foregoing information are redacted and if either: 1. The treatment of an item reflected on such a return is or may be related to the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 2. Such a return or the return information relates or may relate to a transactional relationship between a person who is a party to the proceeding and the taxpayer that directly affects the resolution of an issue in the proceeding. 3. The method of payment of the taxpayer's withholding tax liability or the method of filing the taxpayer's withholding tax return is an issue for the period. U. The department and attorney general may share the information specified in subsection S of this section with any of the following: 1. Federal, state or local agencies located in this state for the purposes of enforcement of the statutes or agreements specified in subsection S of this section or for the purposes of enforcement of corresponding laws of other states. 2. Indian tribes located in this state for the purposes of enforcement of the statutes or agreements specified in subsection S of this section. 3. A court, arbitrator, data clearinghouse or similar entity for the purpose of assessing compliance with or making calculations required by the master settlement agreement or agreements regarding disputes under the master settlement agreement, and with counsel for the parties or expert witnesses in any such proceeding, if the information otherwise remains confidential. V. The department may provide the name and address of qualifying hospitals and qualifying health care organizations, as defined in section 42-5001, to a business that is classified and reporting transaction privilege tax under the utilities classification. W. The department may disclose to an official of any city, town or county in a current agreement or considering a prospective agreement with the department as described in section 42-5032.02, subsection G any information relating to amounts that are subject to distribution and that are required by section 42-5032.02. Information disclosed by the department under this subsection: 1. May be used only by the city, town or county for internal purposes. 2. May not be disclosed to the public in any manner that does not comply with confidentiality standards established by the department. The city, town or county must agree with the department in writing that any release of confidential information that violates the confidentiality standards will result in the immediate suspension of any rights of the city, town or county to receive information under this subsection. X. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department may not disclose information provided by an online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, without the written consent of the online lodging marketplace, and the information may be disclosed only pursuant to subsection A, paragraphs 1 through 6, 8 and 10, subsection B, paragraphs 1, 2, 7 and 8 and subsections C, D and G of this section.  Such information: 1. Is not subject to disclosure pursuant to title 39, relating to public records. 2. May not be disclosed to any agency of this state or of any county, city, town or other political subdivision of this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-5014, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-5014. Return and payment of tax; estimated tax; extensions; abatements; definitions A. Except as provided in subsection B, C, D, E or F of this section, the taxes levied under this article: 1. Are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the month in which the tax accrues. 2. Are delinquent as follows: (a) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically in any month, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of the month. (b) For all other taxpayers, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of the month. B. The department, for any taxpayer whose estimated annual liability for taxes imposed or administered by this article or chapter 6 of this title is between $2,000 and $8,000, shall authorize the taxpayer to pay the taxes on a quarterly basis. The department, for any taxpayer whose estimated annual liability for taxes imposed by this article is less than $2,000, shall authorize the taxpayer to pay the taxes on an annual basis.  For the purposes of this subsection, the taxes due under this article: 1. For taxpayers that are authorized to pay on a quarterly basis, are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of the month next succeeding the quarter in which the tax accrues. 2. For taxpayers that are authorized to pay on an annual basis, are due and payable monthly in the form required by section 42-5018 for the amount of the tax, to the department, on or before the twentieth day of January next succeeding the year in which the tax accrues. 3. Are delinquent as follows: (a) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically in any quarter, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of the month. (b) For all other taxpayers that are required to file and pay quarterly, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of the month. (c) For taxpayers that are required or elect to file and pay electronically on an annual basis, if not received by the department on or before the last business day of January. (d) For all other taxpayers that are required to file and pay annually, if not received by the department on or before the business day preceding the last business day of January. C. The department may require a taxpayer whose business is of a transient character to file the return and remit the taxes imposed by this article on a daily, a weekly or a transaction-by-transaction basis, and those returns and payments are due and payable on the date fixed by the department without a grace period otherwise allowed by this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "business of a transient character" means sales activity by a taxpayer not regularly engaged in selling within this state that is conducted from vehicles, portable stands, rented spaces, structures or booths, or concessions at fairs, carnivals, circuses, festivals or similar activities for not more than thirty consecutive days. D. If the business entity under which a taxpayer reports and pays income tax under title 43 has an annual total tax liability under this article, article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title of $1,000,000 or more in 2019, $1,600,000 or more in 2020, $2,300,000 or more in 2021, $3,100,000 or more in 2022 or $4,100,000 or more in 2023 and each year thereafter, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this article, article 6 of this chapter or chapter 6, article 3 of this title are collected, or if the taxpayer can reasonably anticipate such liability in the current year, the taxpayer shall report on a form prescribed by the department and pay an estimated tax payment each June.  Any other taxpayer may voluntarily elect to pay the estimated tax payment pursuant to this subsection. The payment shall be made on or before June 20 in the same manner as the taxpayer is required to make regular payments and is delinquent if not received by the department on or before the last business day of June if the taxpayer is required to make the payment by electronic means, is delinquent on or before the business day preceding the last business day of June for those taxpayers allowed to file by mail or is delinquent if not received by the department on the business day preceding the last business day of June for those taxpayers allowed to file in person. The estimated tax paid shall be credited against the taxpayer's tax liability under this article, article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for the month of June for the current calendar year. The estimated tax payment shall equal either: 1. One-half of the actual tax liability under this article plus one-half of any tax liability under article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for May of the current calendar year. 2. The actual tax liability under this article plus any tax liability under article 6 of this chapter and chapter 6, article 3 of this title for the first fifteen days of June of the current calendar year. E. An online lodging marketplace, as defined in section 42-5076, that is registered with the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L: 1. Shall remit to the department the applicable taxes payable pursuant to section 42-5076 and chapter 6 of this title with respect to each online lodging transaction, as defined in section 42-5076, facilitated by the online lodging marketplace. 2. Shall report the taxes monthly and remit the aggregate total amounts for each of the respective taxing jurisdictions. 3. Shall not be required to list on the return or on an attachment to the return the following information for each online lodging transaction, as defined in section 42-5076: (a) The transaction privilege tax license number. (b) THe property address. (c) The aMOUNT of tax collected on behalf of or otherwise identify any the individual online lodging operator, as defined in section 42-5076,  on any return or any attachment to a  return. F. A person who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 20 and who is licensed with the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection M shall: 1. File a consolidated return monthly with respect to all managed properties for which the licensee files an electronic consolidated tax return pursuant to section 42-6013. 2. Remit to the department the aggregate total amount of the applicable taxes payable pursuant to this chapter and chapter 6 of this title for all of the respective taxing jurisdictions with respect to the managed properties. G. A peer-to-peer car sharing program that is licensed by the department pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection N: 1. Shall electronically remit to the department the applicable taxes pursuant to section 42-5071 and chapter 6 of this title and any additional taxes, fees or charges on the gross proceeds or gross income of a shared vehicle transaction, subject to the limitations in section 28-9616, and, if the peer-to-peer car sharing program allows owners of vehicles that are not individual-owned shared vehicles to use the peer-to-peer car sharing program, applicable surcharges pursuant to sections 5-839 and 48-4234. 2. Shall electronically report the taxes monthly and remit the aggregate total amounts for each respective taxing jurisdiction. 3. Is not required to list or otherwise identify an individual-owned shared vehicle on any return or any attachment to a return.  The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall retain surcharge and tax information for each peer-to-peer car sharing program transaction and shall provide the information to the department at the department's request. H. The remittance of transaction privilege tax and any other tax applicable to a shared vehicle transaction by a peer-to-peer car sharing program fully satisfies any obligation of a shared vehicle owner to remit any taxes applicable to the shared vehicle transaction. I. The taxpayer shall prepare a return showing the amount of the tax for which the taxpayer is liable for the preceding month,  and shall mail or deliver the return to the department in the same manner and time as prescribed for the payment of taxes in subsection A of this section.  If the taxpayer fails to file the return in the manner and time as prescribed for the payment of taxes in subsection A of this section, the amount of the tax required to be shown on the return is subject to the penalty imposed pursuant to section 42-1125, subsection X, without any reduction for taxes paid on or before the due date of the return.  The return shall be verified by the oath of the taxpayer or an authorized agent or as prescribed by the department pursuant to section 42-1105, subsection B. J. Any person who is taxable under this article and who makes cash and credit sales shall report the cash and credit sales separately and may apply for and obtain from the department an extension of time to pay taxes due on the credit sales. The department shall grant the extension under such rules as the department prescribes. When the extension is granted, the taxpayer shall thereafter include in each monthly report all collections made on such credit sales during the month next preceding and shall pay the taxes due at the time of filing such a report. K. The returns required under this article shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and shall capture data with sufficient specificity to meet the needs of all taxing jurisdictions. L. Any person who is engaged in or conducting business in two or more locations or under two or more business names shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. M. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2017, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $20,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. N. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2018, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $10,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. O. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2019, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $5,000 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. P. For taxable periods beginning from and after December 31, 2020, any taxpayer with an annual total tax liability under this chapter and chapter 6 of this title of $500 or more, based on the actual tax liability in the preceding calendar year, regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this chapter or chapter 6 of this title are collected, or a taxpayer that can reasonably anticipate that liability in the current year, shall file the return required under this article using an electronic filing program established by the department. Q. Any taxpayer that is required to report and pay using an electronic filing program established by the department may apply to the director, on a form prescribed by the department, for an annual waiver from the electronic filing requirement.  The director may grant a waiver, which may be renewed, if any of the following applies: 1. The taxpayer has no computer. 2. The taxpayer has no internet access. 3. Any other circumstance considered to be worthy by the director exists. R. A waiver is not required if the return cannot be electronically filed for reasons beyond the taxpayer's control, including situations in which the taxpayer was instructed by either the internal revenue service or the department of revenue to file by paper. S. The department, for good cause, may extend the time for making any return required by this article and may grant such reasonable additional time within which to make the return as it deems proper, but the time for filing the return shall not be extended beyond the first day of the third month next succeeding the regular due date of the return. T. The department, with the approval of the attorney general, may abate small tax balances if the administration costs exceed the amount of tax due. U. For the purposes of subsection D of this section, "taxpayer" means the business entity under which the business reports and pays state income taxes regardless of the number of offices at which the taxes imposed by this article, article 6 of this chapter or chapter 6, article 3 of this title are collected. V. For the purposes of this section, "individual-owned shared vehicle", "peer-to-peer car sharing program", "shared vehicle owner" and "shared vehicle transaction" have the same meanings prescribed in section 28-9601. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 42-6009, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-6009. Online lodging; definitions A. Except as provided by this section, a city, town or other taxing jurisdiction may not levy a transaction privilege, sales, use, franchise or other similar tax or fee, however denominated, on the business of operating an online lodging marketplace or, in the case of an online lodging marketplace that is licensed pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L, on any online lodging transaction facilitated by the online lodging marketplace or on any online lodging operator with respect to any online lodging transaction for which it has received documentation that the online lodging marketplace has remitted or will remit the applicable tax to the department pursuant to section 42-5014, subsection E. B. In the case of an online lodging marketplace that is licensed pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L, a city, town or other taxing jurisdiction may levy a transaction privilege, sales, use, franchise or other similar tax or fee on an online lodging marketplace from any activity subject to tax under the model city tax code, with the tax base for an online lodging marketplace being limited pursuant to section 42-5076, subject to the following conditions: 1. The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax must be administered in a manner that is uniform with the treatment of online lodging marketplaces, online lodging operators and online lodging transactions provided by chapter 5 of this title, except that: (a) The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax rate may be different from the state tax rate prescribed by section 42-5010. (b) The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax may apply to online lodging transactions involving rentals of lodging accommodations in the city, town or other taxing jurisdiction for more than twenty-nine consecutive days. With respect to any tax on rentals of lodging accommodations for more than twenty-nine consecutive days, in the case of an online lodging marketplace that has registered pursuant to section 42-5005, subsection L, the city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax must uniformly apply to all lodging accommodations in the city, town or other taxing jurisdiction for thirty consecutive days or more, and the tax base for the tax must be limited exclusively to online lodging transactions facilitated by an online lodging marketplace for rentals of lodging accommodations for thirty consecutive days or more and located in the applicable city, town or other taxing jurisdiction. 2. The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax shall be administered, collected and enforced by the department and distributed to the city, town or other taxing jurisdiction in a uniform manner. 3. The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax imposed on online lodging marketplaces and online lodging operators must be uniform with all other taxpayers engaging in the same activity within the jurisdictional boundaries of the city, town or other taxing jurisdiction. 4. Any city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax is subject to: (a) Section 42-6002, relating to audits. (b) Section 42-2003, subsection X, relating to confidential information. (c) (b) Section 42-5003, subsection B, relating to judicial enforcement. (d) (c) Section 42-5005, subsection L, relating to registration of online lodging marketplaces. (e) (d) Section 42-5014, subsection E, relating to tax returns. 5. The city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax may not be collected from an online lodging operator with respect to any online lodging transaction or transactions for which the online lodging operator has received written notice or documentation from a registered online lodging marketplace that it has remitted or will remit the applicable city, town or other taxing jurisdiction tax with respect to those transactions to the department pursuant to section 42-5014, subsection E. C. For the purposes of this section, "lodging accommodations", "online lodging marketplace", "online lodging operator" and "online lodging transaction" have the same meanings prescribed in section 42-5076. END_STATUTE